Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 7. Furlough Programs

§ 7-13-701.
Definitions; establishment of programs.

As used in this section:

“Department” means the state department of corrections;

“Compassionate leave” means a temporary release to visit a member of the inmate’s immediate family who is in danger of death, or to attend the funeral services or other last rites of a member of the inmate’s immediate family;

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, parent, brother or sister.

The department may adopt reasonable rules and regulations which will provide for a reentry furlough program for inmates of any state penal institution. The reentry furlough program shall be designed for inmates who are about to be released on parole or final discharge from imprisonment to aid in their reintegration as productive members of society. The program may provide for escorted or unescorted temporary leaves of absence from the institution for purposes of:

Securing community living arrangements;

Job interviews with prospective employers;

Learning or relearning necessary living skills; and

Other purposes, consistent with the public interest, necessary for the inmate’s successful reintegration into society.

The department may adopt reasonable rules and regulations which will establish a furlough program to provide for escorted or unescorted temporary leaves of absence from any state penal institution for purposes of:

Maintaining the prisoner’s relationship with immediate family members; and

Providing for compassionate leaves.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 12, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-728; Laws 1986, ch. 65, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Alcohol Treatment Center. —

Execution of appellant's sentence was, in essence, conditionally stayed pending appellant's admission to the alcohol treatment center, and he was granted a furlough for that purpose under this section of the statute; however, because appellant willfully refused to conform his behavior to the expectations of the treatment program, he was transferred to the Wyoming Department of Corrections - a condition that was made clear to him at the time of his sentence. While the supreme court did not approve of the departure from the many sentencing alternatives that were available to the district court, appellant's sentence was not illegal under this section of the rule.
Center v. State, 2011 WY 73, 252 P.3d 963,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2010).

Cited

in

Morrison v. State, 2012 WY 41, 272 P.3d 321,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Mar. 20, 2012).

§ 7-13-702.
Escape.

An inmate is deemed guilty of escape from official detention and shall be punished as provided by W.S. 6-5-206(a)(i) if, without proper authorization, he fails to remain within the extended limits of his confinement, the location he has been furloughed to, or fails or neglects to return within the time prescribed or when ordered to do so to the institution from which he received a furlough pursuant to W.S.

7-13-701

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 16, § 1.